District of Columbia statutes.
4-211.04

Moving costs permitted.

The Mayor may pay moving costs when necessary to enable a recipient of public assistance to move into public or private housing.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1104, 29 DCR 1060

History

1981 Ed., § 3-211.4.

Prior Codifications